Washington statutes.
RCW 38.52.930

Transfer of powers, duties, and functions to state military department.

All powers, duties, and functions of the *department of community, trade, and economic development pertaining to emergency management are transferred to the state military department. All references to the director or the department of community development or the *department of community, trade, and economic development in the Revised Code of Washington shall be construed to mean the adjutant general or the state military department when referring to the functions transferred in this section.

[ 1995 c 391 s 10.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: The "department of community, trade, and economic development" was renamed the "department of commerce" by 2009 c 565.

Effective date—1995 c 391: See note following RCW 38.52.005.